Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 4. Relationship of a Limited Liability Company and Its Members to Third Persons.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, §§ 10-13.

§ 13.1-1019.
Liability to third parties.

Except as otherwise provided by this Code or as expressly provided in the articles of organization, no member, manager, organizer or other agent of a limited liability company, regardless of whether the limited liability company has a single member or multiple members, shall have any personal obligation for any liabilities of a limited liability company, whether such liabilities arise in contract, tort or otherwise, solely by reason of being a member, manager, organizer or agent of a limited liability company. For the purposes of this section, a person to whom the rights of a member or manager are delegated as provided in §

13.1-1022

or §

13.1-1024

shall be deemed an agent of a limited liability company.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2004, c. 601; 2006, c. 912; 2015, c. 627.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 added the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912 inserted “organizer” twice in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 627 inserted “regardless of whether the limited liability company has a single member or multiple members” in the first sentence.

§ 13.1-1020.
Parties to actions.

A member of a limited liability company, solely by reason of being a member, is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a limited liability company, except where (i) the object is to enforce a member’s right against or liability to the limited liability company or (ii) as provided in Article 8 (§

13.1-1042

et seq.) of this chapter.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2007, cc. 233, 639.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 233 and 639 are identical, and inserted “solely by reason of being a member.”

§ 13.1-1021.
Limited liability company property.

Any estate or interest in property may be acquired in the name of the limited liability company, and title to any estate or interest so acquired vests in the limited liability company.

History.

1991, c. 168.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

§ 13.1-1021.1.
Agency of members and managers.

Subject to subsections B and C:

Each member is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business;

An act of a member, including the signing of an instrument in the limited liability company name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the limited liability company business or business of the kind carried on by the limited liability company, binds the limited liability company, unless the member had no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the member was dealing knew or had notice that the member lacked authority; and

An act of a member which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the limited liability company business or business of the kind carried on by the limited liability company binds the limited liability company only if the act was authorized by the other members in accordance with §

13.1-1022

.

Subject to subsection C, in a manager-managed limited liability company:

If the articles of organization specify that the limited liability company is to be managed by a manager or managers, a member is not an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business solely by reason of being a member;

Each manager is an agent of the limited liability company for the purpose of its business;

An act of a manager, including the signing of an instrument in the limited liability company name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the limited liability company business or business of the kind carried on by the limited liability company, binds the limited liability company, unless the manager had no authority to act for the limited liability company in the particular matter and the person with whom the manager was dealing knew or had notice that the manager lacked authority; and

An act of a manager which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the limited liability company business or business of the kind carried on by the limited liability company binds the company only if the act was authorized in accordance with §

13.1-1024

.

Unless the articles of organization limit their authority, any member in a member-managed limited liability company, or any manager in a manager-managed limited liability company, may sign and deliver any instrument transferring or affecting the limited liability company’s interest in real property, which instrument shall be conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge of the lack of authority of the person signing and delivering the instrument.

History.

1995, c. 168.